Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.40, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Cannabis event sales. (a) Cannabis microbusinesses with a retail endorsement, cannabis mezzobusinesses with a retail endorsement, cannabis retailers, medical cannabis combination businesses operating a retail location, and lower-potency hemp edible retailers, including the cannabis event organizer, may be authorized to sell cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products to customers at a cannabis event. (b) All sales of cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products at a cannabis event must take place in a retail area as designated in the premises diagram. (c) Authorized retailers may only conduct sales within their specifically assigned area. (d) Authorized retailers must verify the age of all customers pursuant to section 342.27, subdivision 4, before completing a sale and may not sell cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products to an individual under 21 years of age. (e) Authorized retailers may display one sample of each type of cannabis plant, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis product, lower-potency hemp edible, and hemp-derived consumer product available for sale. Samples of adult-use cannabis and adult-use cannabis products must be stored in a sample jar or display case and be accompanied by a label or notice containing the information required to be affixed to the packaging or container containing adult-use cannabis flower and adult-use cannabis products sold to customers. A sample may not consist of more than eight grams of adult-use cannabis flower or adult-use cannabis concentrate, or an edible cannabis product infused with more than 100 milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol. A cannabis retailer may allow customers to smell the adult-use cannabis flower or adult-use cannabis product before purchase. (f) The notice requirements under section 342.27, subdivision 6, apply to authorized retailers offering cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabinoid products, and hemp-derived consumer products for sale at a cannabis event. (g) Authorized retailers may not: (1) sell adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products to a person who is visibly intoxicated; (2) knowingly sell more cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products than a customer is legally permitted to possess; (3) sell medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid products;new text begin ornew text end deleted text begin (4) give away cannabis plants, cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products; or deleted text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end allow for the dispensing of cannabis plants, cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products in vending machines. (h) Except for samples of a cannabis plant, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis product, lower-potency hemp edible, and hemp-derived consumer product, all cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products for sale at a cannabis event must be stored in a secure, locked container that is not accessible to the public. Such items being stored at a cannabis event shall not be left unattended. (i) All cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products for sale at a cannabis event must comply with this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter regarding the testing, packaging, and labeling of those items. (j) All cannabis plants, adult-use cannabis flower, and adult-use cannabis products sold, damaged, or destroyed at a cannabis event must be recorded in the statewide monitoring system.